Missouri, session 2026, HB3540.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 160, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 160.3500, to read as follows:
160.3500. 1. The department of elementary and secondary education shall
develop and make available to school districts and charter schools a voluntary
preventative mental wellness program known as the "Journaling for Joy Program".
The program shall be designed to promote emotional resilience, self-reflection, and
positive behavioral outcomes through structured journaling practices. The program
shall be nonclinical in nature and shall not be construed to provide mental health
diagnosis, treatment, or counseling.
2. Beginning in the 2027-28 school year, any school district or charter school may
elect to implement the program for students enrolled in:
(1) Third grade;
(2) Sixth grade; and
(3) Twelfth grade.
3. The department shall approve age-appropriate curriculum for each grade
level. Each curriculum shall include:
(1) A student journaling workbook;
(2) An instructor guide for classroom implementation;
(3) Structured prompts and reflective exercises;
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 3540 2
(4) Instruction in personal responsibility, emotional regulation, goal setting, and
conflict de-escalation; and
(5) Optional family engagement resources.
4. Any school district or charter school that elects to implement the program and
purchases the approved curriculum shall ensure that participating teachers complete a
training program approved by the department prior to providing instruction. The
department may offer such training through in-person or virtual delivery and may
award professional development credit for completion.
5. The program shall be student-centered, trauma-informed, and focused on
building protective factors that reduce the risk of self-harm and interpersonal violence.
No personally identifiable student mental health data shall be collected for purposes of
the program.
6. Subject to appropriation, the department shall:
(1) Maintain a list of approved curriculum providers;
(2) Develop program guidance for participating schools; and
(3) Provide technical assistance upon request.
7. The department may seek and accept grants, gifts, donations, and federal
funds for the purpose of implementing this section.
8. No later than December first of each even-numbered year, the department of
elementary and secondary education shall submit a report to the general assembly that
includes:
(1) The number of participating schools and districts;
(2) The number of students served;
(3) Available aggregate, non-identifiable outcome data relating to school climate,
attendance, and disciplinary incidents; and
(4) Recommendations for continuation or modification of the program.
9. Implementation of this section shall be subject to appropriation.
10. The director of the department of elementary and secondary education may
promulgate all necessary rules and regulations for the administration of this section.
Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in section 536.010, that is created
under the authority delegated in this section shall become effective only if it complies
with and is subject to all of the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section
536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers vested
with the general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective date,
or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant
of rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28, 2026, shall
be invalid and void.

HB 3540 3
11. The provisions of this section shall expire on August 28, 2033.
✔